Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5004.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 28A.320.126 and 2019 c 333 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:(1) School districts must work collaboratively with local law enforcement agencies, public safety answering points, and ((school security personnel))safety and security staff as defined in RCW 28A.320.124 to develop an emergency response system using evolving technology to expedite the response and arrival of law enforcement in the event of a threat or emergency at a school. ((School districts are encouraged to use the model policies developed by the school safety center in the office of the superintendent of public instruction as a resource.))"Emergency response system" includes at least one of the following:(a) Panic or alert buttons that are tied to school administration, school district staff, and emergency response providers;(b) Live video feed with law enforcement, school district, and school access;(c) Live audio feed with law enforcement, school district, and school access;(d) Remote control access to doors;(e) Live interactive two-way communications; or(f) A system that complies with applicable state building code requirements for group E occupancies for emergency response systems developed under this section or systems developed as part of a safe school plan under RCW 28A.320.125.(2) Each school district must submit a progress report on its implementation of an emergency response system as required under this section to the office of the superintendent of public instruction by ((December 1, 2014))October 1, 2025. By December 1, 2025, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must compile the information submitted by school districts and report to the legislature on the types of emergency response systems used by school districts.(3) This section governs school operation and management under RCW 28A.710.040 and 28A.715.020 and applies to charter schools established under chapter 28A.710 RCW and state-tribal education compact schools subject to chapter 28A.715 RCW.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. This act may be known and cited as Alyssa's law.--- END ---